Hawaii statutes.
[§431C-17] Investigative authority of the
commissioner. The commissioner may investigate suspected fraudulent life
settlement acts and persons engaged in the business of life settlements. [L
2012, c 256, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next